Utah statutes.
63C-11-313.   Withholding of purse.
(1)  The commission, the director, or any other agent authorized by the
commission may order a promoter to withhold any part of a purse or other money
belonging or payable to any contestant, manager, or second if, in the judgment
of the commission, director, or other agent:
(a)  the contestant is not competing honestly or to the best of the
contestant's skill and ability or the contestant otherwise violates any rules
adopted by the commission or any of the provisions of this chapter; or
(b)  the manager or second violates any rules adopted by the commission or any
of the provisions of this chapter.
(2)  This section does not apply to any contestant in a wrestling exhibition
who appears not to be competing honestly or to the best of the contestant's
skill and ability.
(3)  Upon the withholding of any part of a purse or other money pursuant to
this section, the commission shall immediately schedule a hearing on the
matter, provide adequate notice to all interested parties, and dispose of the
matter as promptly as possible.
(4)  If it is determined that a contestant, manager, or second is not entitled
to any part of that person's share of the purse or other money, the promoter
shall pay the money over to the commission.
